Idaho statutes. Title 22 AGRICULTURE AND HORTICULTURE
Chapter 18
IDAHO STATE PESTICIDE MANAGEMENT COMMISSION

Sec.

§ 22-1801. Commission on pesticide management — Established — Composition — Duration of membership — Compensation

Powers and duties. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2016, ch. 19, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

History.

I.C.,§ 22-1801, as added by 2002, ch. 112, § 1, p. 313.

§ 22-1802. State appropriations — Restrictions on use of state money

Commission approval required. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2016, ch. 19, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

History.

I.C.,§ 22-1802, as added by 2002, ch. 112, § 1, p. 313.

§ 22-1803. Deposit and disbursement of funds. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2016, ch. 19, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

History.

I.C.,§ 22-1803, as added by 2002, ch. 112, § 1, p. 313; am. 2003, ch. 32, § 5, p. 115.

§ 22-1804. Duties. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2016, ch. 19, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

History.

I.C.,§ 22-1804, as added by 2002, ch. 112, § 1, p. 313.

§ 22-1805. Report on activities

Review by legislature. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2016, ch. 19, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

History.

I.C.,§ 22-1805, as added by 2002, ch. 112, § 1, p. 313.